Ohio, session 136, HB13.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5.267 of the Revised Code be 3
enacted to read as follows: 4
Sec. 5.267. The fifth day of November is designated as 5
"Roy Rogers Day," in honor of Roy Rogers, also known as "King of 6
the Cowboys," who was a singer and actor from Portsmouth, Ohio. 7